District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.05

Officers and employees.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 6, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1102(b), 46 DCR 6373
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 128(b), 47 DCR 520
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2295.5.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1102(b) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).

Resolutions

Resolution 14-634, the “National Capital Revitalization Corporation Rules Approval Resolution of 2002”, was approved effective December 13, 2002.